Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-869
Commission and board; rules and regulations.

The commission and the board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the performance of their functions under sections 79-859 to 79-871. Recommendations may be made by the commission to the State Board of Education, to school boards or boards of education, and to postsecondary educational institutions which will promote improvement of education and the teaching profession.

Laws 1967, c. 549, § 5, p. 1813;

Laws 1969, c. 731, § 3, p. 2767;

Laws 1989, LB 575, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 39;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1284;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 494.

For other provisions for adopting rules and regulations, see the Administrative Procedure Act, section 84-901 et seq.